Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1993.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Artificial Intelligence in Mental Health Therapy Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Administrative support." A task performed to assist a mental health professional with the logistics of an appointment that does not involve therapeutic communication, including:(1) managing appointment scheduling and reminders;(2) processing billing and insurance claims; and(3) drafting general communications related to therapy 1234567891011121314151617 logistics that do not include therapeutic advice."Artificial intelligence." As follows:(1) A machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments, including the ability to:(i) perceive real and virtual environments;(ii) abstract perceptions made under this paragraph into models through analysis in an automated manner; and(iii) use model inference to formulate options for information or action based on outcomes under subparagraph (i) or (ii).(2) The term includes generative artificial intelligence."Consent." As follows:(1) A clear, explicit affirmative act by an individual that:(i) unambiguously communicates the individual's express, freely given, informed, voluntary, specific and unambiguous written agreement, including a written agreement provided by electronic means; and(ii) is revocable by the individual.(2) The term does not include an agreement that is obtained by the following:(i) The acceptance of a general or broad terms of use agreement or similar document that contains descriptions of artificial intelligence along with other unrelated information.(ii) An individual hovering over, muting, pausing or closing a given piece of digital content.20250HB1993PN2515 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) An agreement obtained through the use of deceptive actions."Generative artificial intelligence." The class of artificial intelligence models that emulate the structure and characteristics of input data in order to generate derived synthetic content, including images, videos, audio, text and more."Mental health professional." An individual who is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized to administer or provide professional mental health care or counseling under:(1) the act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law;(2) the act of March 23, 1972 (P.L.136, No.52), known as the Professional Psychologists Practice Act;(3) the act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act;(4) the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985; or(5) the act of July 9, 1987 (P.L.220, No.39), known as the Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists and Professional Counselors Act."Peer support." Services provided by individuals with lived experience of mental health conditions or recovery from substance use that are intended to offer encouragement, understanding and guidance without clinical intervention."Permitted use of artificial intelligence." Administrative support or supplementary support in therapy or psychotherapy for which the mental health professional maintains full responsibility for all interactions, outputs and data use associated with the system.20250HB1993PN2515 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Religious counseling." Counseling provided by clergy members or pastoral counselors or other religious duties if the services are explicitly faith-based and are not represented as clinical mental health services or therapy or psychotherapy services."Supplementary support." A task performed to assist a mental health professional in the delivery of therapy or psychotherapy services that does not involve therapeutic communication and that is not administrative support, including:(1) preparing and maintaining client records, including therapy notes;(2) analyzing anonymized data to track client progress or identify trends, subject to review by a mental health professional; and(3) identifying and organizing external resources or referrals for client use."Therapeutic communication." A verbal, nonverbal or written interaction conducted in a clinical or professional setting that is intended to diagnose, treat or address an individual's mental, emotional or behavioral health concerns, including the following:(1) Direct interaction with clients for the purpose of understanding or reflecting their thoughts, emotions or experiences.(2) Providing guidance, therapeutic strategies or interventions designed to achieve mental health outcomes.(3) Offering emotional support, reassurance or empathy in response to psychological or emotional distress.(4) Collaborating with clients to develop or modify therapeutic goals or treatment plans.20250HB1993PN2515 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Offering behavioral feedback intended to promote psychological growth or address mental health conditions."Therapy or psychotherapy services." Services provided to diagnose, treat or improve an individual's mental health or behavioral health. The term does not include religious counseling or peer support.Section 3. Permitted use of artificial intelligence.A mental health professional shall not be permitted to use artificial intelligence to assist in providing supplementary support in therapy or psychotherapy services for which the client's therapeutic session is recorded or transcribed unless:(1) The patient or the patient's legally authorized representative is informed in writing:(i) that artificial intelligence will be used; and(ii) the specific purpose of the artificial intelligence tool or system that will be used.(2) The patient or the patient's legally authorized representative provides consent to the use of artificial intelligence.Section 4. Prohibition on unauthorized therapy services.(a) Prohibited statements.--An artificial intelligence provider shall not make any representation or statement or knowingly cause or program an artificial intelligence system made available for use by a person in this Commonwealth to make any representation or statement that explicitly or implicitly indicates that:(1) the artificial intelligence system is capable of providing therapy or psychotherapy services;(2) a user of the artificial intelligence system may interact with any feature of the artificial intelligence 20250HB1993PN2515 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 system which simulates human conversation in order to obtain therapy or psychotherapy services; or(3) the artificial intelligence system, or any component, feature, avatar or embodiment of the artificial intelligence system, is:(i) a provider of therapy or psychotherapy;(ii) a mental health professional;(iii) a therapist;(iv) a clinical therapist;(v) a counselor;(vi) a psychiatrist;(vii) a doctor; or(viii) any other provider of therapy or psychotherapy services.(b) Certain system prohibited.--An artificial intelligence provider shall not make available for use by a person in this Commonwealth an artificial intelligence system that is specifically programmed to provide a service or experience to a user that would constitute the practice of a mental health professional if provided by a natural person.(c) Use of artificial intelligence.--A mental health professional may use artificial intelligence only to the extent that the use meets the requirements of section 3. A mental health professional may not allow artificial intelligence to:(1) make independent therapeutic decisions;(2) directly interact with a client in any form of therapeutic communication;(3) generate therapeutic recommendations or treatment plans without review and approval by the mental health professional; or20250HB1993PN2515 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) detect emotions or mental states.Section 5. Enforcement.A violation of this act shall constitute unprofessional conduct under the following provisions of law, including a substantively similar provision of a successor act:(1) Section 14(a)(9) of the act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law.(2) Section 8(11) of the act of March 23, 1972 (P.L.136, No.52), known as the Professional Psychologists Practice Act.(3) Section 15(a)(8) of the act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act.(4) Section 41(8) of the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985.(5) Section 11(a)(2) of the act of July 9, 1987 (P.L.220, No.39), known as the Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists and Professional Counselors Act.Section 6. Exceptions.This act does not apply to:(1) religious counseling;(2) peer support; or(3) self-help materials and educational resources that are available to the public and do not purport to offer therapy or psychotherapy services.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1993PN2515 - 7 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526